Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1617.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 16-311, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-311. Nomination papers; statement of interest; filing; definitions A. Any person desiring to become a candidate at a primary election for a political party and to have the person's name printed on the official ballot shall be a qualified elector of the party and, not less than one hundred twenty nor more than one hundred fifty days before the primary election, shall sign and cause to be filed a nomination paper giving the person's actual residence address or, if the person does not have an actual residence address, a description of place of residence and post office address, or, if the person's actual residence address is protected pursuant to section 16-153, a post office box or private mailbox address in the candidate's district or precinct, as applicable for a district or precinct office, naming the party of which the person desires to become a candidate, stating the office and district or precinct, if any, for which the person offers the person's candidacy, stating the exact manner in which the person desires to have the person's name printed on the official ballot pursuant to subsection G of this section, and giving the date of the primary election and, if nominated, the date of the general election at which the person desires to become a candidate.  Except for a candidate for United States senator or representative in Congress, a candidate for public office shall be a qualified elector at the time of filing and shall reside in the county, district or precinct that the person proposes to represent.  A candidate for partisan public office shall be continuously registered with the political party of which the person desires to be a candidate beginning no not later than the date of the first petition signature on the candidate's petition through the date of the general election at which the person is a candidate. B. Any person desiring to become a candidate at any nonpartisan election and to have the person's name printed on the official ballot shall be at the time of filing a qualified elector of the county, city, town or district and, not less than one hundred twenty nor more than one hundred fifty days before the election, shall sign and cause to be filed a nomination paper giving the person's actual residence address or, if the person does not have an actual residence address, a description of place of residence and post office address, or, if the person's actual residence address is protected pursuant to section 16-153, a post office box or private mailbox address in the candidate's county, city, town or district and ward or precinct, as applicable for a county, city, town or district and ward or precinct office, stating the office and county, city, town or district and ward or precinct, if any, for which the person offers the person's candidacy, stating the exact manner in which the person desires to have the person's name printed on the official ballot pursuant to subsection G of this section and giving the date of the election. A candidate for office shall reside at the time of filing in the county, city, town, district, ward or precinct that the person proposes to represent. C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, any city or town may adopt by ordinance for its elections the time frame provided in subsection A of this section for filing nomination petitions. The ordinance shall be adopted not less than one hundred fifty days before the first election to which it applies. D. All persons desiring to become a candidate shall file with the nomination paper provided for in subsection A of this section a declaration, which shall be printed in a form prescribed by the secretary of state. The declaration shall include facts sufficient to show that, other than the residency requirement provided in subsection A of this section and the satisfaction of any monetary penalties, fines or judgments as prescribed in subsection J of this section, the candidate will be qualified at the time of election to hold the office the person seeks, and that for any monetary penalties, fines or judgments as prescribed in subsection J of this section, the candidate has made complete payment before the time of filing. E. The nomination paper of a candidate for the office of United States senator or representative in Congress, for the office of presidential elector or for a state office, including a member of the legislature, or for any other office for which the electors of the entire state or a subdivision of the state greater than a county are entitled to vote, shall be filed with the secretary of state no not later than 5:00 p.m. on the last date for filing. F. The nomination paper of a candidate for superior court judge or for a county, district and precinct office for which the electors of a county or a subdivision of a county other than an incorporated city or town are entitled to vote shall be filed with the county elections officer no not later than 5:00 p.m. on the last date for filing as prescribed by subsection A of this section. The nomination paper of a candidate for a city or town office shall be filed with the city or town clerk no not later than 5:00 p.m. on the last date for filing. The nomination paper of a candidate for school district office shall be filed with the county school superintendent no not later than 5:00 p.m. on the last date for filing. G. The nomination paper shall include the exact manner in which the candidate desires to have the person's name printed on the official ballot and shall be limited to the candidate's surname and given name or names, an abbreviated version of such names or appropriate initials such as "Bob" for "Robert", "Jim" for "James", "Wm." for "William" or "S." for "Samuel".  Nicknames are permissible, but nicknames, abbreviated versions or initials of given names may not suggest reference to professional, fraternal, religious or military titles and may not include a slogan, a promotional word or phrase or any word that does not actually constitute a nickname. No other descriptive name or names shall be printed on the official ballot, except as provided in this section. Candidates' abbreviated names or nicknames may be printed within quotation marks.  The candidate's surname shall be printed first, followed by the given name or names. H. Not later than the date of the first petition signature on a nomination petition, a person who may be a candidate for office pursuant to this section shall file a statement of interest with the appropriate filing officer for that office. The statement of interest shall contain the name of the person, the political party, if any, and the name of the office that may be sought. Any nomination petition signatures collected before the date the statement of interest is filed are invalid and subject to challenge.  This subsection does not apply to: 1. Candidates for elected office for special taxing districts that are established pursuant to title 48. 2. Candidates for precinct committeeman. 3. Candidates for president or vice president of the United States. I. A person who does not file a timely nomination paper that complies with this section is not eligible to have the person's name printed on the official ballot for that office.  The filing officer shall not accept the nomination paper of a candidate for state or local office unless the person provides or has provided all of the following: 1. The financial disclosure statement as prescribed for candidates for that office. 2. The declaration of qualification and eligibility as prescribed in subsection D of this section. J. Except in cases where the liability is being appealed, the filing officer shall not accept the nomination paper of a candidate for state or local office if the person is liable for an aggregation of $1,000 or more in fines, penalties,  or late fees or administrative or civil judgments, including any interest or costs, in any combination, that have not been fully satisfied at the time of the attempted filing of the nomination paper and the liability arose from failure to comply with or enforcement of chapter 6 of this title. K. For the purposes of this title: 1. "Election district" means this state, any county, city, town, precinct or other political subdivision or a special district that is not a political subdivision, that is authorized by statute to conduct an election and that is authorized or required to conduct its election in accordance with this title. 2. "Nomination paper" means the form filed with the appropriate office by a person wishing to declare the person's intent to become a candidate for a particular political office. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 16-312, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-312. Filing of nomination papers for write-in candidates A. Any person desiring to become a write-in candidate for an elective office in any election shall be at the time of filing a qualified elector of the county or district the person proposes to represent and shall have been a resident of that county or district for one hundred twenty days before the date of the election, except that for a city or town office, section 9-232 applies with respect to residency for the candidate. The person shall file a nomination paper, signed by the candidate, giving the person's actual residence address or, if the person does not have an actual residence address, a description of place of residence and post office address, or, if the person's actual residence address is protected pursuant to section 16-153, a post office box or private mailbox address in the candidate's district, precinct or municipality, as applicable for the district, precinct or municipal office that the person proposes to represent, and the person's age, length of residence in the state and date of birth. B. A write-in candidate shall file the nomination paper not earlier than one hundred fifty days before the election and not later than 5:00 p.m. on the sixtieth day before the election, except that: 1. A candidate running as a write-in candidate as provided in section 16-343, subsection D shall file the nomination paper not later than 5:00 p.m. on the fifth day before the election. 2. A candidate running as a write-in candidate for an election that may be canceled pursuant to section 16-410 shall file the nomination paper not later than 5:00 p.m. on the one hundred sixth day before the election. C. The write-in filing procedure shall be in the same manner as prescribed in section 16-311. Any person who does not file a timely nomination paper shall not be counted in the tally of ballots. The filing officer shall not accept the nomination paper of a candidate for state or local office unless the candidate provides or has provided the financial disclosure statement as prescribed for candidates for that office. D. Except in cases where the liability is being appealed, the filing officer shall not accept the nomination paper of a write-in candidate for state or local office if the person is liable for an aggregation of $1,000 or more in fines, penalties,  or late fees or administrative or civil judgments, including any interest or costs, in any combination, that have not been fully satisfied at the time of the attempted filing of the nomination paper and the liability arose from failure to comply with or enforcement of chapter 6 of this title. E. The secretary of state shall notify the various boards of supervisors as to write-in candidates filing with the secretary of state's office. The county school superintendent shall notify the appropriate board of supervisors as to write-in candidates filing with the superintendent's office. The board of supervisors shall notify the appropriate election board inspector of all candidates who have properly filed such statements. In the case of a city or town election, the city or town clerk shall notify the appropriate election board inspector of candidates properly filed. No other write-ins shall be counted. The election board inspector shall post the notice of official write-in candidates in a conspicuous location within the polling place. F. Except as provided in section 16-343, subsection E, a candidate may not file pursuant to this section if any of the following applies: 1. For a candidate in the general election, the candidate ran in the immediately preceding primary election and failed to be nominated to the office sought in the current election. 2. For a candidate in the general election, the candidate filed a nomination petition for the immediately preceding primary election for the office sought and failed to provide a sufficient number of valid petition signatures as prescribed by section 16-322. 3. For a candidate in the primary election, the candidate filed a nomination petition for the current primary election for the office sought and failed to provide a sufficient number of valid petition signatures as prescribed by section 16-322, withdrew from the primary election after a challenge was filed or was removed from or otherwise determined by court order to be ineligible for the primary election ballot. 4. For a candidate in the general election, the candidate filed a nomination petition for nomination other than by primary election for the office sought and failed to provide a sufficient number of valid petition signatures as prescribed by section 16-341. G. A person who files a nomination paper pursuant to this section for the office of president of the United States shall designate in writing to the secretary of state at the time of filing the name of the candidate's vice presidential running mate, the names of presidential electors who will represent that candidate and a statement signed by the vice presidential running mate and designated presidential electors that indicates their consent to be designated.  A nomination paper for each presidential elector designated shall be filed with the candidate's nomination paper. The number of presidential electors shall equal the number of United States senators and representatives in Congress from this state. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 16-341, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-341. Nomination petition; method and time of filing; form; qualifications and number of petitioners required; statement of interest A. Any qualified elector who is not a registered member of a political party that is recognized pursuant to this title may be nominated as a candidate for public office otherwise than by primary election or by party committee pursuant to this section. B. This article shall not be used to place on the general election ballot the name of a political party that fails to meet the qualifications specified in section 16-802 or 16-804, or the name of any candidate representing such party or the name of a candidate who has filed a nomination petition in the immediately preceding primary election and has failed to qualify as the result of an insufficient number of valid signatures. C. A nomination petition stating the name of the office to be filled, the name and residence of the candidate, or, if the candidate does not have an actual residence address, a description of place of residence and post office address, or, if the person's actual residence address is protected pursuant to section 16-153, a post office box or private mailbox address in the candidate's district, precinct or municipality, as applicable for a district, precinct or municipal office, and other information required by this section shall be filed with the same officer with whom primary nomination papers and petitions are required to be filed as prescribed in section 16-311. Except for candidates for the office of presidential elector filed pursuant to this section, the petition shall be filed not less than one hundred twenty days nor more than one hundred fifty days before the primary election.  The petition shall be signed only by voters who have not signed the nomination petitions of a candidate for the office to be voted for at that primary election. D. The nomination petition shall be in substantially the following form, except that if the candidate does not have an actual residence address, the candidate may use a description of place of residence and post office address, or, if the candidate's actual residence address is protected pursuant to section 16-153, a post office box or private mailbox address in the candidate's district, precinct or municipality, as applicable for a district, precinct or municipal office, is sufficient: The undersigned, qualified electors of __________ county, state of Arizona, do hereby nominate __________, who resides at __________ in the county of __________, as a candidate for the office of _______ at the general (or special, as the case may be) election to be held on the ________ day of _________, _____. I hereby declare that I have not signed the nomination petitions of any candidate for the office to be voted for at this primary election, and I do hereby select the following designation under which name the said candidate shall be placed on the official ballot (here insert such designation not exceeding three words in length as the signers may select). E. The nomination petition shall conform as nearly as possible to the provisions relating to nomination petitions of candidates to be voted for at primary elections and shall be signed by at least the number of persons who are registered to vote determined by calculating three percent of the persons who are registered to vote of the state, county, subdivision or district for which the candidate is nominated who are not members of a political party that is qualified to be represented by an official party ballot at the next ensuing primary election and accorded representation on the general election ballot. F. The percentage of persons who are registered to vote necessary to sign the nomination petition shall be determined by the total number of registered voters from other than political parties that are qualified to be represented by an official party ballot at the next ensuing primary election and accorded representation on the general election ballot in the state, county, subdivision or district on January 2 of the year in which the general election is held. Notwithstanding the method prescribed by subsection E of this section and this subsection for calculating the minimum number of signatures necessary, any person who is registered to vote in the state, county, subdivision or district for which the candidate is nominated is eligible to sign the nomination petition without regard to the signer's party affiliation. G. A nomination petition for any candidate may be circulated by a person who is not a resident of this state but who is otherwise eligible to register to vote in this state if that person registers as a circulator with the secretary of state before circulating petitions. The nomination petition for the office of presidential elector shall include a group of names of candidates equal to the number of United States senators and representatives in Congress from this state instead of separate nomination petitions for each candidate for the office of presidential elector. A valid signature on a petition containing a group of presidential electors candidates is counted as a signature for the nomination of each of the candidates. The presidential candidate whom the candidates for presidential elector will represent shall designate in writing to the secretary of state the names of the candidates who will represent the presidential candidate before any signatures for the candidate can be accepted for filing. A nomination petition for the office of presidential elector shall be filed not less than eighty nor more than one hundred days before the general election. The petition shall be signed only by qualified electors who have not signed the nomination petitions of a candidate for the office of presidential elector to be voted for at that election. H. The secretary of state shall require in the instructions and procedures manual issued pursuant to section 16-452 that persons who circulate nomination petitions pursuant to this section and who are not residents of this state but who are otherwise eligible to register to vote in this state shall register as circulators with the office of the secretary of state before circulating petitions. The secretary of state shall provide for a method of receiving service of process for those petition circulators who are registered. I. Not later than the date of the first petition signature on a nomination petition, a person who may be a candidate for office pursuant to this section shall file a statement of interest with the appropriate filing officer for that office.  The statement of interest shall contain the name of the person, the political party, if any, and the name of the office that may be sought. Any nomination petition signatures collected before the date the statement of interest is filed are invalid and subject to challenge. This subsection does not apply to: 1. Candidates for elected office for special taxing districts that are established pursuant to title 48. 2. Candidates for precinct committeeman. 3. Candidates for president or vice president of the United States. J. A person who files a nomination paper pursuant to this section for the office of president of the United States shall designate in writing to the secretary of state at the time of filing the name of the candidate's vice presidential running mate, the names of the presidential electors who will represent that candidate and a statement that is signed by the vice presidential running mate and the designated presidential electors and that indicates their consent to be designated.  A nomination paper for each presidential elector designated shall be filed with the candidate's nomination paper. The number of presidential electors shall equal the number of United States senators and representatives in Congress from this state. K. A candidate who does not file a timely nomination petition that complies with this section is not eligible to have the candidate's name printed on the official ballot for that office.  The filing officer shall not accept the nomination paper of a candidate for state or local office unless the candidate provides or has provided all of the following: 1. The financial disclosure statement as prescribed for candidates for that office. 2. The declaration of qualification and eligibility as prescribed in section 16-311. L. Not later than sixty days before the date of the general election, a candidate for governor who files a nomination petition pursuant to this section shall submit to the secretary of state the name of the person who will be the joint candidate for lieutenant governor with that gubernatorial candidate and whose name will appear on the general election ballot jointly with the candidate for governor. M. Except in cases where the liability is being appealed, the filing officer shall not accept the nomination paper of a candidate for state or local office if the person is liable for an aggregation of $1,000 or more in fines, penalties,  or late fees or administrative or civil judgments, including any interest or costs, in any combination, that have not been fully satisfied at the time of the attempted filing of the nomination paper and the liability arose from failure to comply with or enforcement of chapter 6 of this title. N. The secretary of state may authorize for statewide and legislative offices the creation, use and submission of petitions prescribed by this section in electronic form if those petitions provide for an appropriate method to verify signatures of petition circulators and signers. The secretary of state may require use of a unique marking system for petition pages, including a bar code, a quick response code or another similar marking system. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 16-928, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-928. Filing officer; statements and reports A. A person that is required to file any statements and reports required by this article and articles 1, 1.1, 1.2, 1.3, 1.5, 1.6 and 1.7 of this chapter shall file with the filing officer in charge of that election, as follows: 1. The secretary of state is the filing officer for statewide and legislative elections, including retention elections for supreme court justices and court of appeals judges. The secretary of state is also the filing officer for committees that support or oppose a recall election or the circulation of a petition for a recall election for a statewide or legislative officeholder, for committees that support or oppose a statewide initiative or referendum or other statewide ballot measure, question or proposition or the circulation of a petition for a statewide initiative or referendum or other statewide ballot measure, question or proposition. 2. The county officer in charge of elections is the filing officer for county, school district, community college district and special taxing district elections, including retention elections for superior court judges. The county officer in charge of elections is also the filing officer for committees that support or oppose a recall election or the circulation of a petition for a recall election for an officeholder of a county office, a school district governing board office, a community college district governing board office or a special taxing district governing board office, for committees that support or oppose a county, school district, community college district or special taxing district initiative or referendum or other ballot measure, question or proposition, including bond, tax, budget and budget override measures or that oppose or support the circulation of a petition for a county, school district, community college district or special taxing district initiative or referendum or other county, school district, community college district or special taxing district ballot measure, question or proposition. 3. The city or town clerk is the filing officer for city and town elections. The city or town clerk is also the filing officer for committees that support or oppose a recall election or the circulation of a petition for a recall election for a city or town officeholder, for committees that support or oppose a city or town initiative or referendum or other city or town ballot measure, question or proposition or the circulation of a petition for a city or town initiative or referendum or other city ballot measure, question or proposition. B. Notwithstanding subsection A of this section, a standing committee shall file reports only with the secretary of state. C. A filing officer shall provide the option for electronic filing, and shall make all statements and reports publicly available on the internet and shall include a listing of all committees that owe fines for late filing of reports. A filing officer may comply with this section by opting into the secretary of state's electronic filing system.END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Section 16-937, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-937. Failure to file; penalties; notice; suspension A. If a committee fails to timely file a complete report as prescribed by articles 1, 1.1, 1.2, 1.3, 1.4, 1.5 and 1.6 of this chapter, the filing officer shall send a written notice by e-mail email to the committee within five days after the filing deadline that identifies the late report, describes how fines accrue and identifies methods of payment. B. A committee that fails to timely file a report shall pay the filing officer a penalty of ten dollars $10 for each day that the filing is late during the first fifteen days after the filing deadline and twenty-five dollars $25 for each subsequent day that the filing is late.  Penalties accrue until the late report is filed, except that the maximum amount that a committee may accrue for each late report in a single reporting period is $5,000. Within thirty days after the end of a reporting period, a committee must SATISFY or dispute with the filing officer all late fines, penalties or fees. C. If a committee fails to file a complete report within thirty days after the filing deadline and after providing notice pursuant to subsection A of this section, the filing officer may notify the appropriate enforcement officer prescribed in this article.  For committees that file with the secretary of state and before any REFERRAL to the attorney general pursuant to this section or section 16-938, the secretary of state may waive accrued penalties for good cause, such as the death of the treasurer or candidate or an information technology failure. D. For any political action committee or political party that fails to file three consecutive complete reports, the filing officer shall send by e-mail email to the committee a notice of temporary suspension and the following apply: 1. On receipt, the committee's authority to operate in the jurisdiction is temporarily suspended. 2. The notice shall state that failure to comply with all filing and payment requirements within thirty days after the date of the notice shall result in permanent suspension of the committee's authority to operate in that jurisdiction. E. After compliance with subsection D of this section, the filing officer may permanently suspend the committee and shall notify the committee by e-mail email and is not required to provide any further notice.  Permanent or temporary suspension does not eliminate eliminates a committee's continuing obligation to file reports and pay any outstanding and accruing penalties to provided by law limits the accrual of penalties to those penalties incurred by the failure to file three reports. F. For any committee that has no activity for two years after the date of the suspension prescribed by subsection E of this section, the secretary of state may deem the committee terminated. G. An individual who serves as an officer of a committee that has accrued penalties pursuant to this SECTION may not form or serve on any other committee that is required to file with any filing officer prescribed by section 16-928 until the accrued penalties are paid. END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Committee compliance period; waiver Notwithstanding any other law, during the six months after the effective date of this act, the secretary of state may accept committee filings and may waive penalties of more than $1,000 without referral to the attorney general under section 16-937, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act, or section 16-938, Arizona Revised Statutes.